West Virginia, session 2026, HB5667.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: CHAPTER 5B. ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT ACT OF 1985. ARTICLE 2. DEPARTMENT OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT. §5B-2-4b. Directing funds from the Division of Economic Development to the West Virginia Division of Highways. Effective July 1, 2026, the amount of $20 million shall be directed from the Division of Economic Development to the West Virgina Division of Highways, Region 2, for the acceleration of public road infrastructure repairs, projects, and paving in Wayne and Mingo Counties. CHAPTER 22C. ENVIRONMENTAL RESOURCES; BOARDS, AUTHORITIES, COMMISSIONS AND COMPACTS. ARTICLE 1. WATER DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY. §22C-1-4a.  Directing funds from the Water Development Authority to the Wayne County Commission and the Mingo County Commission. Effective July 1, 2026, the amount of $20 million shall be directed from the Water Development Authority as follows:(1) Ten million dollars to the Wayne County Commission for water infrastructure.(2) Ten million dollars to the Mingo County Commission for water infrastructure.